Hawaii statutes.
§236D-9 Amended returns; final
determination. (a) If an amended federal return is filed, there
immediately shall be filed with the department an amended Hawaii report with a
true copy of the amended federal return. If an additional tax under this chapter
is required to be paid pursuant to the amended return, the person required to
pay the tax shall pay the additional tax, together with interest as provided in
section 236D-7, at the same time the amended return is filed, subject to any
extension election under section 236D-7.

(b) Upon final determination of the federal
tax due, the person, within sixty days after the determination, shall give
written notice of the determination to the department in such forms as may be
prescribed. If any additional tax is due under this chapter by reason of the
determination, the person shall pay the tax, together with interest as provided
in section 236D-7, at the same time the notice is filed, subject to any
extension election under section 236D-7. [L 1983, c 217, pt of §1; am L 1994, c
142, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next